Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.140

Gifts.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5143-S.SL) ***

No state officer or state employee may receive, accept, take, seek, or solicit, directly or indirectly, any thing of economic value as a gift, gratuity, or favor from a person if it could be reasonably expected that the gift, gratuity, or favor would influence the vote, action, or judgment of the officer or employee, or be considered as part of a reward for action or inaction.

[ 1994 c 154 s 114.]